Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.020

Archaeological resource preservation—Designation of department of archaeology and historic preservation—Cooperation among agencies.

The discovery, identification, excavation, and study of the state's archaeological resources, the providing of information on archaeological sites for their nomination to the state and national registers of historic places, the maintaining of a complete inventory of archaeological sites and collections, and the providing of information to state, federal, and private construction agencies regarding the possible impact of construction activities on the state's archaeological resources, are proper public functions; and the department of archaeology and historic preservation, created under the authority of chapter 43.334 RCW, is hereby designated as an appropriate agency to carry out these functions. The director shall provide guidelines for the selection of depositories designated by the state for archaeological resources. The legislature directs that there shall be full cooperation amongst the department and other agencies of the state.

[ 2005 c 333 s 19; 2002 c 211 s 2; 1986 c 266 s 16; 1977 ex.s. c 195 s 12; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 82 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 134 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2002 c 211: "The purpose of this act is to give the *department of community, trade, and economic development the authority to issue civil penalties to enforce the provisions of permits issued under RCW 27.53.060 and to take into consideration prior penalties issued under chapter 27.53 RCW and under comparable federal laws when issuing permits. Additionally, this act provides guidance to state agencies and political subdivisions of the state when approving archaeological activities on public lands." [ 2002 c 211 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: The "department of community, trade, and economic development" was renamed the "department of commerce" by 2009 c 565.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 195: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 195 s 20.]